Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.080

Final budget to be fixed.

Upon the conclusion of the budget hearing the county legislative authority shall fix and determine each item of the budget separately and shall by resolution adopt the budget as so finally determined and enter the same in detail in the official minutes of the board, a copy of which budget shall be forwarded to the state auditor.

[ 1995 c 301 s 64; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.080. Prior: 1943 c 145 s 1, part; 1941 c 99 s 1, part; 1923 c 164 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 3997-4, part.]